Utah statutes.
59-2-1712.   Rules prescribed by commission.

In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the commission may make rules and prescribe forms as necessary to administer this part.



Enacted by Chapter 197, 2012 General Session

